third_party/liblouis/src/tables/fr-bfu-g2.ctb
word madame		134-145
word mademoiselle	134-134
word magnificence	134-2356-14
word magnificences	134-2356-14-234
word magnifique		134-2356
word magnifiques	134-2356-234
word magnifiquement	134-2356-134
word maintenant		134-2345
word malgré		134-12456
word malheur		134-125
word malheurs		134-125-234
word malheureuse	134-125-234-15
word malheureuses	134-125-234-156
word malheureusement	134-125-234-134
word malheureux		134-125-1346
word manière		134-1345
word manières		134-1345-234
word mauvais		134-1236
word mauvaise		134-1236-15
word mauvaises		134-1236-156
word meilleur		134-123
word meilleurs		134-123-234
word meilleure		134-123-15
word meilleures		134-123-156
word merci		134-14
word mercis		134-14-234
word mère		134-2346
word mères		134-2346-234
word mes		134-234
word mesdames		134-145-234
word mesdemoiselles	134-134-234
word messieurs		134-1235-234
prfword mettre		134-356
word mieux		134-1346
prfword mission		134-3456
prfword missions		134-3456-234
prfword missionnaire	134-3456-1235
prfword missionnaires	134-3456-1235-234
prfword mobile		134-12
prfword mobiles		134-12-234
prfword mobilisation	134-12-16
prfword mobilisations	134-12-16-234
prfword mobilité		134-12-2345
prfword mobilités		134-12-2345-234
word moins		134-35
word moment		134-26
word moments		134-26-234
word momentanément	134-26-134
word monsieur		134-1235
word multiple		134-1246
word multiples		134-1246-234
prfword multiplicateur	134-1246-46
prfword multiplicateurs	134-1246-46-234
prfword multiplication	134-1246-16
prfword multiplications	134-1246-16-234
word multiplicité	134-1246-2345
word multiplicités	134-1246-2345-234
word musique		134-12345
word musiques		134-12345-234
word mystère		134-13456
word mystères		134-13456-234
word mystérieuse	134-13456-234-15
word mystérieuses	134-13456-234-156
word mystérieusement	134-13456-234-134
word mystérieux		134-13456-1346

word naguère		1345-1245
word nation		1345-16
word nations		1345-16-234
word national		1345-16-123
word nationale		1345-16-123-15
word nationales		1345-16-123-156
word nationalité	1345-16-123-2345
word nationalités	1345-16-123-2345-234
word nationaux		1345-16-1346
word nature		1345-2345
word natures		1345-2345-234
word naturel		1345-2345-123
word naturels		1345-2345-123-234
word naturelle		1345-2345-123-123
word naturelles		1345-2345-123-123-234
word naturellement	1345-2345-123-134
word néanmoins		1345-134
word nécessaire		1345-14
word nécessaires	1345-14-234
word nécessairement	1345-14-134
word nécessité		1345-14-2345
word nécessités		1345-14-2345-234
word nécessiteuse	1345-14-2345-234-15
word nécessiteuses	1345-14-2345-234-156
word nécessiteux	1345-14-2345-1346
prfword nombre		1345-12
prfword nombres		1345-12-234
word nombreuse		1345-12-234-15
word nombreuses		1345-12-234-156
word nombreux		1345-12-1346
word nos		1345-234
word notre		1345-356
word nôtre		1345-1456
word nôtres		1345-1456-234
prfword nouveau		1345-1236
prfword nouveaux		1345-1236-1346
word nouveauté		1345-1236-2345
word nouveautés		1345-1236-2345-234
word nouvel		1345-123
word nouvelle		1345-123-123
word nouvelles		1345-123-123-234
prfword nouvellement	1345-123-134

word objectif		135-245-124
word objectifs		135-245-124-234
word objection		135-245-3456
word objections		135-245-3456-234
word objective		135-245-1236
word objectives		135-245-1236-234
word objectivement	135-245-1236-134
word objectivité	135-245-1236-2345
word objectivités	135-245-1236-2345-234
word objet		135-245
word objets		135-245-234
word observateur	135-12-46
word observateurs	135-12-46-234
word observation	135-12
word observations	135-12-234
word occasion		135-14
word occasions		135-14-234
word occasionnel	135-14-123
word occasionnels	135-14-123-234
word occasionnelle	135-14-123-123
word occasionnelles	135-14-123-123-234
word occasionnellement	135-14-123-134
word oeuvre		246-1236
word oeuvres		246-1236-234
word office		135-124
word offices		135-124-234
word officiel		135-124-123
word officiels		135-124-123-234
word officielle		135-124-123-123
word officielles		135-124-123-123-234
word officiellement	135-124-123-134
word officieuse		135-124-234-15
word officieuses	135-124-234-156
word officieusement	135-124-234-134
word officieux		135-124-1346
word opinion		135-1234
word opinions		135-1234-234
prfword ordinaire		56-145
prfword ordinaires		56-145-234
prfword ordinairement	56-145-134
word originaire		135-1245-1235
word originaires	135-1245-1235-234
word originairement	135-1245-1235-134
word original		135-1245-123
word originale		135-1245-123-15
word originales		135-1245-123-156
word originalement	135-1245-123-134
word originalité	135-1245-123-2345
word originalités	135-1245-123-2345-234
word originaux		135-1245-1346
word origine		135-1245
word origines		135-1245-234
word outrage		1256-356-1245
word outrages		1256-356-1245-234
word outrageuse		1256-356-1245-234-15
word outrageuses	1256-356-1245-234-156
word outrageusement	1256-356-1245-234-134
word outrageux		1256-356-1245-1346
word outre		1256-356
word ouvrage		1256-1245
word ouvrages		1256-1245-234
word ouvrier		1256-1236
word ouvriers		1256-1236-234
word ouvrière		1256-2346
word ouvrières		1256-2346-234

word parfois		1234-124
word parmi		1234-134
word parole		1234-1235
word paroles		1234-1235-234
word particularité	1234-1235-123-2345
word particularités	1234-1235-123-2345-234
word particulier	1234-123
word particuliers	1234-123-234
word particulière	1234-123-1235
word particulières	1234-123-1235-234
word particulièrement	1234-123-1235-134
word partout		1234-1
word pas		1234-234
contraction ps	1234-234
word pauvre		1234-1236
word pauvres		1234-1236-234
word pauvrement		1234-1236-134
word pauvreté		1234-1236-2345
word pauvretés		1234-1236-2345-234
word pendant		1234-145
word pensée		1234-26
word pensées		1234-26-234
word pensif		1234-26-124
word pensifs		1234-26-124-234
word pensive		1234-26-1236
word pensives		1234-26-1236-234
word pensivement	1234-26-1236-134
word père		1234-2346
word pères		1234-2346-234
word personnage		1234-1345-1245
word personnages	1234-1345-1245-234
word personnalité	1234-1345-123-2345
word personnalités	1234-1345-123-2345-234
word personne		1234-1345
word personnes		1234-1345-234
word personnel		1234-1345-123
word personnels		1234-1345-123-234
word personnelle	1234-1345-123-123
word personnelles	1234-1345-123-123-234
word personnellement	1234-1345-123-134
word petit		1234-15
word petits		1234-15-234
word petite		1234-15-15
word petites		1234-15-156
word peuple		1234-1246
word peuples		1234-1246-234
prfword peuplement		1234-1246-134
prfword peuplements	1234-1246-134-234
prfword place		1246-14
prfword places		1246-14-234
prfword placement		1246-14-134
prfword placements		1246-14-134-234
prfword plaisir		1246-1235
prfword plaisirs		1246-1235-234
word plusieurs		1246-234
word plutôt		1246-2345
word point		1234-2345
word points		1234-2345-234
word pointe		1234-2345-15
word pointes		1234-2345-15-234
word populaire		1234-1234-1235
word populaires		1234-1234-1235-234
word populairement	1234-1234-1235-134
word popularité		1234-1234-1235-2345
word popularités	1234-1234-1235-2345-234
prfword population		1234-1234
prfword populations	1234-1234-234
word populeuse		1234-1234-234-15
word populeuses		1234-1234-234-156
word populeux		1234-1234-1346
prfword possibilité	1234-12-2345
prfword possibilités	1234-12-2345-234
prfword possible		1234-12
prfword possibles		1234-12-234
prfword possibilité	1234-12-2345
prfword possibilités	1234-12-2345-234
word pourquoi		1234-23456
word pourtant		1234-135
prfword praticable		235-2345-45
prfword praticables	235-2345-45-234
word pratique		235-2345
word pratiques		235-2345-234
word pratiquement	235-2345-134
word premier		235-134
word premiers		235-134-234
word première		235-1235
word premières		235-1235-234
word premièrement	235-1235-134
word près		235-234
word presque		235-12345
word preuve		235-1236
word preuves		235-1236-234
word primitif		235-134-124
word primitifs		235-134-124-234
word primitive		235-134-1236
word primitives		235-134-1236-234
word primitivement	235-134-1236-134
word principal		235-14-123
word principale		235-14-123-15
word principales	235-14-123-156
word principalement	235-14-123-134
word principaux		235-14-1346
word principe		235-14
word principes		235-14-234
word prix		235-1346
prfword probabilité	235-12-2345
prfword probabilités	235-12-2345-234
prfword probable		235-12
prfword probables		235-12-234
prfword probablement	235-12-134
word prochain		235-12356
word prochains		235-12356-234
word prochaine		235-1345
word prochaines		235-1345-234
word prochainement	235-1345-134
word producteur		235-145-46
word producteurs	235-145-46-234
prfword productif		235-145-124
prfword productifs		235-145-124-234
prfword production		235-145-3456
prfword productions	235-145-3456-234
prfword productive		235-145-1236
prfword productives	235-145-1236-234
prfword productivement	235-145-1236-134
prfword productivité	235-145-1236-2345
prfword productivités	235-145-1236-2345-234
word produit		235-145
word produits		235-145-234
word profit		235-124
word profits		235-124-234
word profitable		235-124-45
word profitables	235-124-45-234
word profitablement	235-124-45-134
word profiteur		235-124-46
word profiteurs		235-124-46-234
word profiteuse		235-124-234-15
word profiteuses	235-124-234-156
word progrès		235-12456
word progressif		235-12456-124
word progressifs	235-12456-124-234
word progression	235-12456-3456
word progressions	235-12456-3456-234
word progressive	235-12456-1236
word progressives	235-12456-1236-234
word progressivement	235-12456-1236-134
word progressivité	235-12456-1236-2345
word progressivités	235-12456-1236-2345-234
word projecteur		235-245-46
word projecteurs	235-245-46-234
word projection		235-245-3456
word projections	235-245-3456-234
word projet		235-245
word projets		235-245-234
prfword proportion		235-1234
prfword proportions	235-1234-234
prfword proportionnalité	235-1234-123-2345
prfword proportionnalités	235-1234-123-2345-234
prfword proportionnel	235-1234-123
prfword proportionnels	235-1234-123-234
prfword proportionnelle	235-1234-123-123
prfword proportionnelles	235-1234-123-123-234
prfword proportionnellement 235-1234-123-134
word proposition	235-246
word propositions	235-246-234
word puisque		1234-12345
prfword puissance		1234-14
contraction pc	1234-14
prfword puissances		1234-14-234

word qualitatif		12345-123-2345-124
word qualitatifs	12345-123-2345-124-234
word qualitative	12345-123-2345-1236
word qualitatives	12345-123-2345-1236-234
word qualitativement	12345-123-2345-1236-134
word qualité		12345-123-2345
word qualités		12345-123-2345-234
word quand		12345-145
word quant		12345-2345
word quantitatif	12345-2345-2345-124
word quantitatifs	12345-2345-2345-124-234
word quantitative	12345-2345-2345-1236
word quantitatives	12345-2345-2345-1236-234
word quantitativement	12345-2345-2345-1236-134
word quantité		12345-2345-2345
word quantités		12345-2345-2345-234
word quel		12345-123
word quels		12345-123-234
word quelle		12345-123-123
word quelles		12345-123-123-234
word quelconque		12345-14
word quelconques	12345-14-234
word quelque		12345-12345
word quelques		12345-12345-234
word quelquefois	12345-124
word question		12345-3456
word questions		12345-3456-234
word questionnaire	12345-3456-1235
word questionnaires	12345-3456-1235-234
word quiconque		12345-346
word quoique		12345-15
